Colorado statutes. TITLE 25.5 Health Care Policy and Financing
PART 1 GENERAL PROVISIONS
25.5-1-116. Records confidential - authorization to obtain records of assets - release of location information to law enforcement agencies - outstanding felony arrest warrants.

The state department may establish reasonable rules to provide safeguards restricting the use or disclosure of information concerning applicants, recipients, and former and potential recipients of medical assistance to purposes directly connected with the administration of such medical assistance and related state department activities and covering the custody, use, and preservation of the records, papers, files, and communications of the state and county departments. Whenever, under provisions of law, names and addresses of applicants for, recipients of, or former and potential recipients of medical assistance are furnished to or held by another agency or department of government, such agency or department shall be required to prevent the publication of lists thereof and their uses for purposes not directly connected with the administration of such medical assistance.

Except as provided in subparagraphs (II) and (III) of this paragraph (a), it is unlawful for any person to solicit, disclose, or make use of or to authorize, knowingly permit, participate in, or acquiesce in the use of any lists or names of or any information concerning persons applying for or receiving public assistance and welfare directly or indirectly derived from the records, papers, files, or communications of the state or county departments or subdivisions or agencies thereof or acquired in the course of the performance of official duties. No financial institution or insurance company that provides the data, whether confidential or not, required by the state department, in accordance with the provisions of this subsection (2), shall be liable for the provision of the data to the state department nor for any use made thereof by the state department.
(2) (a) (I) Except as provided in subparagraphs (II) and (III) of this paragraph (a), it is unlawful for any person to solicit, disclose, or make use of or to authorize, knowingly permit, participate in, or acquiesce in the use of any lists or names of or any information concerning persons applying for or receiving public assistance and welfare directly or indirectly derived from the records, papers, files, or communications of the state or county departments or subdivisions or agencies thereof or acquired in the course of the performance of official duties. No financial institution or insurance company that provides the data, whether confidential or not, required by the state department, in accordance with the provisions of this subsection (2), shall be liable for the provision of the data to the state department nor for any use made thereof by the state department.

The information described in subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (a) may be disclosed for purposes directly connected with the administration of medical assistance and in accordance with this paragraph (a) and paragraphs (b) and (c) of this subsection (2) and with the rules of the state department.

Notwithstanding any provision of state law to the contrary and to the extent allowable under federal law, at the request of the Colorado bureau of investigation, the state department shall provide the bureau with information concerning the location of any person whose name appears in the department's records who is the subject of an outstanding felony arrest warrant. Upon receipt of such information, it shall be the responsibility of the bureau to provide appropriate law enforcement agencies with location information obtained from the state department. Location information provided pursuant to this section shall be used solely for law enforcement purposes. The state department and the bureau shall determine and employ the most cost-effective method for obtaining and providing location information pursuant to this section. Neither the state department nor its employees or agents shall be liable in civil action for providing information in accordance with the provisions of this sub-subparagraph (A).

As used in sub-subparagraph (A) of this subparagraph (III), "law enforcement agency" means any agency of the state or its political subdivisions that is responsible for enforcing the laws of this state. "Law enforcement agency" includes but is not limited to any police department, sheriff's department, district attorney's office, the office of the state attorney general, and the Colorado bureau of investigation.

By signing an application or redetermination of eligibility form for medical assistance, an applicant authorizes the state department to obtain records pertaining to information provided in that application or redetermination of eligibility form from a financial institution, as defined in section 15-15-201 (4), C.R.S., or from any insurance company. The application or redetermination of eligibility form shall contain language clearly indicating that signing constitutes such an authorization.

In order to determine if applicants for or recipients of medical assistance have assets within eligibility limits, the state department may provide a list of information identifying these applicants or recipients to any financial institution, as defined in section 15-15-201 (4), C.R.S., or to any insurance company. This information may include identification numbers or social security numbers. The state department may require any such financial institution or insurance company to provide a written statement disclosing any assets held on behalf of individuals adequately identified on the list provided. Before a termination notice is sent to the recipient, the county department or the medical assistance site in verifying the accuracy of the information obtained as a result of the match shall contact the recipient and inform the recipient of the apparent results of the computer match and give the recipient the opportunity to explain or correct any erroneous information secured by the match. The requirement to run a computerized match shall apply only to information that is entered in the financial institution's or insurance company's data processing system on the date the match is run and shall not be deemed to require any such institution or company to change its data or make new entries for the purpose of comparing identifying information. The cost of providing such computerized match shall be borne by the state department.

For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 1984, and thereafter, all funds expended by the state department to pay the cost of providing such computerized matches shall be subject to an annual appropriation by the general assembly.

The state department may expend funds appropriated pursuant to subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (c) in an amount not to exceed the amount of annualized general fund savings that result from the termination of recipients from medical assistance specifically due to disclosure of assets pursuant to this subsection (2).

No applicant shall be denied nor any recipient discontinued due to the disclosure of their assets unless and until the county department or medical assistance site has assured that such assets taken together with other assets exceed the limit for eligibility of countable assets. Any information concerning assets found may be used to determine if such applicant's or recipient's eligibility for other medical assistance is affected.

The applicant for or recipient of medical assistance, or his or her representative, shall have an opportunity to examine all applications and pertinent records concerning said applicant or recipient which constitute a basis for denial, modification, or termination of such medical assistance or to examine such records in case of a fair hearing.

Any person who violates subsection (1) or (2) of this section commits a petty offense.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire part amended, p. 1790, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

(4) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3240, § 481, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section was contained in a 2006 act that amended this part, resulting in the addition of this section.

25.5-1-117. County departments - district departments.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, there is established in each county of the state a county department of human or social services that consists of a county board of human or social services, a county director of human or social services, and any additional employees as may be necessary for the efficient performance of public assistance, as defined in section 26-2-103 (7), and medical assistance.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (2) is effective until July 1, 2024.] Single entry point agencies established pursuant to part 1 of article 6 of this title 25.5, other than county departments of human or social services acting as single entry point agencies, may act as state designated agencies and are authorized to carry out functions as specified in part 1 of article 6 of this title 25.5 that are otherwise performed by county departments of human or social services.

(2)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (2) is effective July 1, 2024.

]

Case management agencies established pursuant to part 17 of article 6 of this title 25.5 may act as state designated agencies and are authorized to carry out functions as specified in part 17 of article 6 of this title 25.5 that are otherwise performed by county departments of human or social services.

With the approval of the state department of human services, two or more counties may jointly establish a district department of human or social services. All duties and responsibilities for county departments of human or social services set forth in this title 25.5 also apply to district departments of human or social services.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire part amended, p. 1792, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2018:

Entire section amended, (SB 18-092), ch. 38, p. 444, § 108, effective August 8.

L. 2021:

(2) amended, (HB 21-1187), ch. 83, p. 331, § 22, effective July 1, 2024.

Editor's note:

This section was contained in a 2006 act that amended this part, resulting in the addition of this section.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 18-092, see section 1 of chapter 38, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

25.5-1-118. Duties of county departments.

The county departments or other state designated agencies, where applicable, shall serve as agents of the state department and shall be charged with the administration of medical assistance and related activities in the respective counties in accordance with the rules of the state department.

The county departments or other state designated agencies, where applicable, shall report to the state department at such times and in such manner and form as the state department may from time to time direct.

The county department or other state designated agencies, where applicable, in each county shall submit quarterly and annually to the board of county commissioners a budget containing an estimate and supporting data setting forth the amount of money needed to carry out the provisions of this title.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire part amended, p. 1793, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section was contained in a 2006 act that amended this part, resulting in the addition of this section.

25.5-1-119. County staff.

The county director, with the approval of the county board, shall appoint such staff as may be necessary as determined by the state department rules to administer medical assistance within the county. The staff shall be appointed and shall serve in accordance with a merit system for the selection, retention, and promotion of county department employees as described in section 26-1-120, C.R.S. The salaries of the staff members shall be fixed in accordance with the rules and salary schedules prescribed by the state department or the department of human services, whichever is appropriate; except that, once a county transfers its county employees to a successor merit system as provided in section 26-1-120, C.R.S., the salaries shall be fixed by the county commissioners.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire part amended, p. 1793, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section was contained in a 2006 act that amended this part, resulting in the addition of this section.

25.5-1-120. Appropriations.

For carrying out the duties and obligations of the state department and county departments under the provisions of this title and for matching such federal funds or meeting maintenance of effort requirements as may be available for public assistance and welfare activities in the state, including medical assistance administration and related activities, the general assembly, in accordance with the constitution and laws of the state of Colorado, shall make adequate appropriations for the payment of such costs, pursuant to the budget prepared by the executive director.

If the federal law shall provide federal funds, in cash or in another form such as medical assistance, not otherwise provided for in this title, the state department is authorized to make such payments or offer such services in accordance with the requirements accompanying said federal funds within the limits of available state appropriations.

When the executive director determines that adequate appropriations for the payment of the costs described in paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) have not been made and that an overexpenditure of an appropriation will occur based upon the state department's estimates, the state board may take actions consistent with state and federal law to bring the rate of expenditure into line with available funds. The general assembly declares that case load and utilization based on medical necessity are legitimate reasons for supplemental funding.

The general assembly shall appropriate from the general fund to the state department moneys for the costs of administering medical assistance programs and the state's share of the costs of administering such functions by the county departments amounts sufficient for the proper and efficient performance of the duties imposed upon them by law, including a legal advisor appointed by the attorney general. The general assembly shall make two separate appropriations, one for the administrative costs of the state department and another for the administrative costs of the county departments. Any applicable matching federal funds shall be apportioned in accordance with the federal regulations accompanying such funds. Any unobligated and unexpended balances of appropriated state general funds remaining at the end of each fiscal year shall be credited to the state general fund.

The expenses of training personnel for special skills relating to medical assistance, as such expenses shall be determined and approved by the state department, may be paid from state and federal funds available for such training purposes.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire part amended, p. 1793, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section was contained in a 2006 act that amended this part, resulting in the addition of this section.

25.5-1-121. County expenditures - advancements - procedures.

For purposes of this article, under rules of the state department, administrative costs shall include: Salaries of the county director and employees of the county department staff engaged in the performance of medical assistance activities; the county's payments on behalf of such employees for old age and survivors' insurance or pursuant to a county officers' and employees' retirement plan and for any health insurance plan, if approved by the state department; the necessary travel expenses of the county board and the administrative staff of the county department in the performance of their duties; necessary telephone and other electronic means of communication; necessary equipment and supplies; necessary payments for postage and printing, including the printing and preparation of county warrants required for the administration of the county department; and such other administrative costs as may be approved by the state department; but advancements for office space, utilities, and fixtures may be made from state funds only if federal matching funds are available.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, the county department may spend in excess of twenty percent of actual costs for the purpose of matching federal funds for the administration of the child support enforcement program or for the administrative costs of activities involving food stamp, public assistance, or medical assistance fraud investigations or prosecutions.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, the county department may receive and spend federal funds to which it is entitled based on the county's certification of public expenditures for administrative costs made by other entities within the county, which expenditures:

Are from sources other than the county social services fund;

Are in excess of the county department's portion, as required pursuant to section 25.5-1-114 (2)(a), of the administrative costs; and

Are for an administrative activity that has been approved by the state department as an activity that is eligible for reimbursement under a federal program.

Acceptance and expenditure of federal funds pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (3) shall not affect the state's share of and contribution to the administrative costs. The county shall be solely responsible for certifying the nonfederal share that is in excess of the county's required portion of the administrative costs. The state department may retain up to five percent of any federal funds received by a county department pursuant to this subsection (3). In addition, the state, in accordance with the provisions of section 26-1-109 (4)(d), C.R.S., shall recover any federal funds received by the county through the certification of public expenditures that are subsequently determined to be ineligible for federal reimbursement.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire part amended, p. 1794, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2011:

(3) added, (HB 11-1196), ch. 160, p. 555, § 6, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section was contained in a 2006 act that amended this part, resulting in the addition of this section.

25.5-1-122. County appropriation increases - limitations.

Beginning in calendar fiscal year 1994 and for each calendar fiscal year thereafter to and including calendar fiscal year 1997, the board of county commissioners in each county of this state shall annually appropriate funds for the county share of the administrative costs of medical assistance in the county in an amount equal to the actual county share for the previous fiscal year adjusted by an amount equal to the actual county share for the previous fiscal year multiplied by the percentage of change in property tax revenue.

For the purposes of this section:

"County share" means the actual amount of the county share for the previous fiscal year. "County share" shall not include:

The amount expended by the county from the county contingency fund or the county tax base relief fund pursuant to section 26-1-126, C.R.S.;

The amount expended by the county for general assistance pursuant to part 1 of article 17 of title 30, C.R.S.; and

The amount expended by the county for programs or services provided by the county on its own, without requirements or funding from any other governmental agency.

"Percentage of change in property tax revenue" means the difference between the total property tax levied for the previous fiscal year less the amount levied for debt service for the previous fiscal year and the total property tax levied for the year for which the percentage of change in tax revenue is being calculated less the amount levied for debt service for the year in which the percentage of change in tax revenue is being calculated divided by the total property tax levied for the previous fiscal year less the amount levied for debt service for the previous fiscal year.

Notwithstanding the provisions of section 25.5-1-121, a county in the state shall not be required to contribute more than the amount set forth in subsection (1) of this section in any fiscal year. Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the ability of a county to establish programs or services provided by the county on its own, without requirements or funding from any other governmental agency.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2008, p. 1812, § 3, effective June 2, 2008.)

Any amounts remaining in the county social services fund created in section 26-1-123, C.R.S., at the end of any fiscal year shall remain in the county fund for expenditure as determined by the board of county commissioners for administrative costs of public assistance, medical assistance, and food stamps, and program costs of public assistance and food stamps.

The limitation set forth in this section on the increase in the county share of the administrative costs of medical assistance will result in increased costs to the state. By making state funds available, the state is encouraging counties not to exercise any right a county may have pursuant to section 20 (9) of article X of the Colorado constitution to reduce or end its share of the costs of medical assistance administration for the county for three fiscal years following the fiscal year in which the state funds are received. If a county accepts funds from the state based on the limitation provided in this section for any fiscal year, the county agrees not to exercise any rights the county may have to reduce or end its share of the costs of medical assistance administration for the fiscal year in which the funds are accepted. Nothing in this subsection (6) or any agreement pursuant to this subsection (6) shall be construed to affect the existence or status of any rights accruing to the state or any county pursuant to section 20 (9) of article X of the Colorado constitution.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire part amended, p. 1795, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(2)(a)(I) and (4) amended, p. 1812, § 3, effective June 2.

Editor's note:

This section was contained in a 2006 act that amended this part, resulting in the addition of this section.

25.5-1-123. Medical homes for children - legislative declaration - duties of the department.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that:

The best medical care for infants, children, and adolescents is provided through a medical home, as defined in section 25.5-1-103, and that is consistent with the joint principles of a patient-centered medical home. Those principles shall include a whole-person orientation, care that is coordinated and integrated across all elements of the complex health-care system and the patient's community, and care that provides for quality and safety of the patient where qualified health-care practitioners provide primary care and help manage and facilitate all aspects of medical care.

Infants, children, and adolescents and their families work best with a health-care practitioner who knows the family and who develops a partnership of mutual responsibility and trust;

Medical care provided through emergency departments, walk-in clinics, and other urgent-care facilities is often more costly and less effective than care given by a physician with prior knowledge of the child and his or her family; and

The state department should strive to find a medical home for each child receiving services through the state medical assistance program, articles 4, 5, and 6 of this title, or the children's basic health plan, article 8 of this title.

On or before July 1, 2008, the state department, in conjunction with the Colorado medical home initiative in the department of public health and environment, shall develop systems and standards to maximize the number of children enrolled in the state medical assistance program or the children's basic health plan who have a medical home. The systems and standards developed shall include, but need not be limited to, ways to ensure that a medical home shall offer family-centered, compassionate, culturally effective care and sensitive, respectful communication to a child and his or her family.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire section added, p. 1488, § 2, effective May 31.

L. 2017:

(3) repealed, (HB 17-1060), ch. 6, p. 15, § 3, effective March 1.

25.5-1-124. Early intervention payment system - participation by state department - rules - definitions.

The state department shall participate in the development and implementation of the coordinated system of payment for early intervention services authorized pursuant to part 4 of article 3 of title 26.5 and part C of the federal "Individuals with Disabilities Education Act", 20 U.S.C. sec. 1400 et seq., as amended.

The state department shall ensure that the early intervention services and payments for recipients of medical assistance pursuant to this title 25.5 are integrated into the coordinated early intervention payment system developed pursuant to part 4 of article 3 of title 26.5. To the extent necessary to achieve the coordinated payment system and coverage of those early intervention services pursuant to this title 25.5, the state department shall amend the state plan for medical assistance or seek the necessary federal authorization, promulgate rules, and modify the billing system for medical assistance to facilitate the coordinated payment system.

The state department shall also make any modifications necessary to the "Children's Basic Health Plan Act", article 8 of this title 25.5, including promulgating rules, to ensure that the children's basic health plan is integrated into the coordinated early intervention payment system developed pursuant to part 4 of article 3 of title 26.5.

Repealed.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires, "early intervention services" means those services defined as early intervention services by the department of early childhood in accordance with section 26.5-3-402 (9) that are determined, through negotiation between the state department and the department of early childhood, to be medically necessary under medical assistance and cost-effective. After negotiating the scope of early intervention services to be covered under medical assistance, the state department and the department of early childhood shall submit to the joint budget committee of the general assembly, as part of each department's annual budget request, a proposal for the scope of coverage of early intervention services under medical assistance, including the anticipated costs of such coverage and whether the payment of such costs through medical assistance is cost-effective.

"Early intervention services" shall not include the following:

Nonemergency medical transportation;

Respite care;

Service coordination, as defined in 34 CFR 303.12 (d)(11); and

Assistive technology.

The exclusion of assistive technology shall not apply to durable medical equipment that is otherwise covered under the children's basic health plan, as defined in section 25.5-8-103 (2).

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire section added, p. 888, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(5)(a) amended, p. 1468, § 14, effective August 5.

L. 2012:

(4) repealed, (HB 12-1247), ch. 53, p. 196, § 6, effective March 22.

L. 2022:

(1), (2), (3), and (5)(a) amended, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 847, § 74, effective July 1.

25.5-1-125. Centennial care choices - value benefit plans - request for information - request for proposals - report to general assembly - definitions - legislative declaration. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire section added, p. 2057, § 1, effective June 3.

L. 2010:

(2)(b)(VI) amended, (HB 10-1422), ch. 419, p. 2109, § 137, effective August 11.

L. 2013:

Entire section repealed, (HB 13-1139), ch. 120, p. 407, § 1, effective August 7.

25.5-1-126. Discounted prices for durable medical equipment and supplies.

The state department shall work with one or more nonprofit organizations to develop a link of approved vendors who are willing to sell durable medical equipment and medical supplies at discounted prices to persons who have applied for, but are not yet receiving, benefits under the "Colorado Medical Assistance Act". The state department shall provide the exclusive criteria for a nonprofit organization to use to approve a vendor for placement on the approved vendor list.

The state department shall maintain a link of approved vendors developed pursuant to this section and shall:

Make the link available on the state department's website; and

Provide copies of the list to county departments and to sites authorized to accept medical assistance applications pursuant to section 25.5-4-205 (1), through the survey given to applicants.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire section added, (HB 10-1029), ch. 219, p. 958, § 1, effective May 10.

25.5-1-127. Third-party benefit denials information.

The state department shall provide information to recipients of benefits under this title concerning their right to appeal a denial of benefits by a third party and shall post information on the state department's website concerning recipients' abilities to appeal a third party's denial of benefits, including but not limited to providing a link to information on the insurance commissioner's website regarding such appeals.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire section added, (SB 10-002), ch. 366, p. 1727, § 2, effective June 7.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in the 2010 act adding this section, see section 1 of chapter 366, Session Laws of Colorado 2010.

25.5-1-128. Provider payments - compliance with state fiscal requirements - definitions - rules.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, when the state department has regulatory authority over a program and when the provider has already signed a state department-approved provider application to provide a service or to bill the state department or its authorized contractor for a service, the state department-approved provider application shall serve to fulfill the requirements of a commitment voucher and the fiscal requirements of section 24-30-202 (1), C.R.S.

The executive director may promulgate rules to exempt a provider who provides services through a program as described in paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) for any program the state department is authorized by law to administer, including but not limited to:

The "Colorado Medical Assistance Act", articles 4 to 6 of this title;

The "Children's Basic Health Plan Act", article 8 of this title;

The "Colorado Indigent Care Program", part 1 of article 3 of this title;

The school health services program authorized by section 25.5-5-318;

Programs that are funded through the primary care fund, created in section 24-22-117 (2)(b), C.R.S.; and

The state-funded old age pension health and medical care program pursuant to article 2 of this title.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise provides, "provider" means a health-care provider, a mental health-care provider, a pharmacist, a home health agency, a general provider as defined in section 25.5-3-103 (3), school district as defined in section 25.5-5-318 (1)(a), or any other entity that provides health care, health-care coordination, outreach, enrollment, or administrative support services to recipients through fee-for-service, the primary care physician program, a managed care entity, a behavioral health organization, a medical home, or any system of care that coordinates health care or services as defined and authorized through rules promulgated by the state board or by the executive director.

Source:

L. 2012:

Entire section added, (HB 12-1054), ch. 14, p. 36, § 1, effective March 15.